reglas.foma
define vocal 
[a|a0|a1|e|e0|e1|i|i0|i1|o|o0|o1|u|u0|u1] ; 

define rrRule 
r -> [rr] || .#. _, [l|n|s] _ ; 

define psiException 
{psi} -> {si} || .#. _ ; 

define WordEndRules 
{ay} -> [a i c] || _ .#. ,, 
c -> k || _ .#. ;

define approximants 
{b} -> [bh] || vocal _ vocal ,, 
{d} -> [dh] || vocal _ vocal ,, 
{g} -> [gh] || vocal _ vocal ,, 
{v} -> [vh] || vocal _ vocal ; 

define IRule 
y -> i || .#. _ .#. ; 

regex 
psiException .o. 
WordEndRules .o. 
rrRule .o. 
approximants .o. 
IRule ;
